Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,199
Permit fees.

The State Fire Marshal shall establish by rules and regulations a schedule of permit fees not to exceed fifty dollars for each amusement ride. Such permit fees shall be established with due regard for the costs of administering the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1809;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 35.